Ohio, session 136, HB431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 3328.24 be 5
amended and section 3313.675 of the Revised Code be enacted to 6
read as follows: 7
Sec. 3313.675. (A) Beginning with the 2027-2028 school 8
year, each school district shall annually screen each student 9
using the university of Toledo's FOCUS youth screening tool to 10
identify students who may be at risk of or involved in human 11
trafficking. Each school district shall provide the results of 12
the screenings to the university of Toledo. 13
(B) Beginning in 2026, the university of Toledo shall 14
provide training to each school district on how to use the 15
screening tool. The university of Toledo shall make the 16
screening tool available to all school districts in digital and 17
physical form. 18
(C) The university of Toledo shall create an online portal 19
to track results of the screening tool. The university shall 20

H. B. No. 431 Page 2
As Introduced
compile all data received from school districts and make the 21
data publicly available through the portal. 22
(D) The university of Toledo shall not disclose the names 23
or personally identifiable information of any student who 24
completes the screening tool. Results associated with the 25
screening tool are not public records within the meaning of 26
section 149.43 of the Revised Code. 27
Sec. 3314.03. A copy of every contract entered into under 28
this section shall be filed with the director of education and 29
workforce. The department of education and workforce shall make 30
available on its web site a copy of every approved, executed 31
contract filed with the director under this section. 32
(A) Each contract entered into between a sponsor and the 33
governing authority of a community school shall specify the 34
following: 35
(1) That the school shall be established as either of the 36
following: 37
(a) A nonprofit corporation established under Chapter 38
1702. of the Revised Code, if established prior to April 8, 39
2003; 40
(b) A public benefit corporation established under Chapter 41
1702. of the Revised Code, if established after April 8, 2003. 42
(2) The education program of the school, including the 43
school's mission, the characteristics of the students the school 44
is expected to attract, the ages and grades of students, and the 45
focus of the curriculum; 46
(3) The academic goals to be achieved and the method of 47
measurement that will be used to determine progress toward those 48

H. B. No. 431 Page 3
As Introduced
goals, which shall include the statewide achievement 49
assessments; 50
(4) Performance standards, including but not limited to 51
all applicable report card measures set forth in section 3302.03 52
or 3314.017 of the Revised Code, by which the success of the 53
school will be evaluated by the sponsor; 54
(5) The admission standards of section 3314.06 of the 55
Revised Code and, if applicable, section 3314.061 of the Revised 56
Code; 57
(6)(a) Dismissal procedures; 58
(b) A requirement that the governing authority adopt an 59
attendance policy that includes a procedure for automatically 60
withdrawing a student from the school if the student without a 61
legitimate excuse fails to participate in seventy-two 62
consecutive hours of the learning opportunities offered to the 63
student. 64
(7) The ways by which the school will achieve racial and 65
ethnic balance reflective of the community it serves; 66
(8) Requirements for financial audits by the auditor of 67
state. The contract shall require financial records of the 68
school to be maintained in the same manner as are financial 69
records of school districts, pursuant to rules of the auditor of 70
state. Audits shall be conducted in accordance with section 71
117.10 of the Revised Code. 72
(9) An addendum to the contract outlining the facilities 73
to be used that contains at least the following information: 74
(a) A detailed description of each facility used for 75
instructional purposes; 76

H. B. No. 431 Page 4
As Introduced
(b) The annual costs associated with leasing each facility 77
that are paid by or on behalf of the school; 78
(c) The annual mortgage principal and interest payments 79
that are paid by the school; 80
(d) The name of the lender or landlord, identified as 81
such, and the lender's or landlord's relationship to the 82
operator, if any. 83
(10) Qualifications of employees, including both of the 84
following: 85
(a) A requirement that the school's classroom teachers be 86
licensed in accordance with sections 3319.22 to 3319.31 of the 87
Revised Code, except that a community school may engage 88
noncertificated persons to teach up to twelve hours or forty 89
hours per week pursuant to section 3319.301 of the Revised Code; 90
(b) A prohibition against the school employing an 91
individual described in section 3314.104 of the Revised Code in 92
any position. 93
(11) That the school will comply with the following 94
requirements: 95
(a) The school will provide learning opportunities to a 96
minimum of twenty-five students for a minimum of nine hundred 97
twenty hours per school year. 98
(b) The governing authority will purchase liability 99
insurance, or otherwise provide for the potential liability of 100
the school. 101
(c) The school will be nonsectarian in its programs, 102
admission policies, employment practices, and all other 103
operations, and will not be operated by a sectarian school or 104

H. B. No. 431 Page 5
As Introduced
religious institution. 105
(d) The school will comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 106
109.65, 121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 3301.0710, 107
3301.0711, 3301.0712, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 108
3313.472, 3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.50, 3313.539, 3313.5310, 109
3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.609, 3313.6012, 3313.6013, 110
3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 111
3313.6029, 3313.643, 3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 112
3313.661, 3313.662, 3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 113
3313.6610, 3313.67, 3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.675, 114
3313.69, 3313.71, 3313.716, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 115
3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.814, 3313.816, 116
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 117
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.238, 3319.318, 118
3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 119
3319.46, 3319.90, 3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 120
3321.01, 3321.041, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 121
3321.19, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 122
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 117., 1347., 123
2744., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 4167. of the 124
Revised Code as if it were a school district and will comply 125
with section 3301.0714 of the Revised Code in the manner 126
specified in section 3314.17 of the Revised Code. 127
(e) The school shall comply with Chapter 102. and section 128
2921.42 of the Revised Code. 129
(f) The school will comply with sections 3313.61, 130
3313.611, 3313.614, 3313.617, 3313.618, and 3313.6114 of the 131
Revised Code, except that for students who enter ninth grade for 132
the first time before July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 133
3313.61 and 3313.611 of the Revised Code that a person must 134

H. B. No. 431 Page 6
As Introduced
successfully complete the curriculum in any high school prior to 135
receiving a high school diploma may be met by completing the 136
curriculum adopted by the governing authority of the community 137
school rather than the curriculum specified in Title XXXIII of 138
the Revised Code or any rules of the department. Beginning with 139
students who enter ninth grade for the first time on or after 140
July 1, 2010, the requirement in sections 3313.61 and 3313.611 141
of the Revised Code that a person must successfully complete the 142
curriculum of a high school prior to receiving a high school 143
diploma shall be met by completing the requirements prescribed 144
in section 3313.6027 and division (C) of section 3313.603 of the 145
Revised Code, unless the person qualifies under division (D) or 146
(F) of that section. Each school shall comply with the plan for 147
awarding high school credit based on demonstration of subject 148
area competency, and beginning with the 2017-2018 school year, 149
with the updated plan that permits students enrolled in seventh 150
and eighth grade to meet curriculum requirements based on 151
subject area competency adopted by the department under 152
divisions (J)(1) and (2) of section 3313.603 of the Revised 153
Code. Beginning with the 2018-2019 school year, the school shall 154
comply with the framework for granting units of high school 155
credit to students who demonstrate subject area competency 156
through work-based learning experiences, internships, or 157
cooperative education developed by the department under division 158
(J)(3) of section 3313.603 of the Revised Code. 159
(g) The school governing authority will submit within four 160
months after the end of each school year a report of its 161
activities and progress in meeting the goals and standards of 162
divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section and its financial 163
status to the sponsor and the parents of all students enrolled 164
in the school. 165

H. B. No. 431 Page 7
As Introduced
(h) The school, unless it is an internet- or computer- 166
based community school, will comply with section 3313.801 of the 167
Revised Code as if it were a school district. 168
(i) If the school is the recipient of moneys from a grant 169
awarded under the federal race to the top program, Division (A), 170
Title XIV, Sections 14005 and 14006 of the "American Recovery 171
and Reinvestment Act of 2009," Pub. L. No. 111-5, 123 Stat. 115, 172
the school will pay teachers based upon performance in 173
accordance with section 3317.141 and will comply with section 174
3319.111 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 175
(j) If the school operates a preschool program that is 176
licensed by the department under sections 3301.52 to 3301.59 of 177
the Revised Code, the school shall comply with sections 3301.50 178
to 3301.59 of the Revised Code and the minimum standards for 179
preschool programs prescribed in rules adopted by the department 180
of children and youth under section 3301.53 of the Revised Code. 181
(k) The school will comply with sections 3313.6021 and 182
3313.6023 of the Revised Code as if it were a school district 183
unless it is either of the following: 184
(i) An internet- or computer-based community school; 185
(ii) A community school in which a majority of the 186
enrolled students are children with disabilities as described in 187
division (B)(2) of section 3314.35 of the Revised Code. 188
(l) The school will comply with section 3321.191 of the 189
Revised Code, unless it is an internet- or computer-based 190
community school that is subject to section 3314.261 of the 191
Revised Code. 192
(12) Arrangements for providing health and other benefits 193
to employees; 194

H. B. No. 431 Page 8
As Introduced
(13) The length of the contract, which shall begin at the 195
beginning of an academic year. No contract shall exceed five 196
years unless such contract has been renewed pursuant to division 197
(E) of this section. 198
(14) The governing authority of the school, which shall be 199
responsible for carrying out the provisions of the contract; 200
(15) A financial plan detailing an estimated school budget 201
for each year of the period of the contract and specifying the 202
total estimated per pupil expenditure amount for each such year. 203
(16) Requirements and procedures regarding the disposition 204
of employees of the school in the event the contract is 205
terminated or not renewed pursuant to section 3314.07 of the 206
Revised Code; 207
(17) Whether the school is to be created by converting all 208
or part of an existing public school or educational service 209
center building or is to be a new start-up school, and if it is 210
a converted public school or service center building, 211
specification of any duties or responsibilities of an employer 212
that the board of education or service center governing board 213
that operated the school or building before conversion is 214
delegating to the governing authority of the community school 215
with respect to all or any specified group of employees provided 216
the delegation is not prohibited by a collective bargaining 217
agreement applicable to such employees; 218
(18) Provisions establishing procedures for resolving 219
disputes or differences of opinion between the sponsor and the 220
governing authority of the community school; 221
(19) A provision requiring the governing authority to 222
adopt a policy regarding the admission of students who reside 223

H. B. No. 431 Page 9
As Introduced
outside the district in which the school is located. That policy 224
shall comply with the admissions procedures specified in 225
sections 3314.06 and 3314.061 of the Revised Code and, at the 226
sole discretion of the authority, shall do one of the following: 227
(a) Prohibit the enrollment of students who reside outside 228
the district in which the school is located; 229
(b) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in 230
districts adjacent to the district in which the school is 231
located; 232
(c) Permit the enrollment of students who reside in any 233
other district in the state. 234
(20) A provision recognizing the authority of the 235
department to take over the sponsorship of the school in 236
accordance with the provisions of division (C) of section 237
3314.015 of the Revised Code; 238
(21) A provision recognizing the sponsor's authority to 239
assume the operation of a school under the conditions specified 240
in division (B) of section 3314.073 of the Revised Code; 241
(22) A provision recognizing both of the following: 242
(a) The authority of public health and safety officials to 243
inspect the facilities of the school and to order the facilities 244
closed if those officials find that the facilities are not in 245
compliance with health and safety laws and regulations; 246
(b) The authority of the department as the community 247
school oversight body to suspend the operation of the school 248
under section 3314.072 of the Revised Code if the department has 249
evidence of conditions or violations of law at the school that 250
pose an imminent danger to the health and safety of the school's 251

H. B. No. 431 Page 10
As Introduced
students and employees and the sponsor refuses to take such 252
action. 253
(23) A description of the learning opportunities that will 254
be offered to students including both classroom-based and non- 255
classroom-based learning opportunities that is in compliance 256
with criteria for student participation established by the 257
department under division (H)(2) of section 3314.08 of the 258
Revised Code; 259
(24) The school will comply with sections 3302.04 and 260
3302.041 of the Revised Code, except that any action required to 261
be taken by a school district pursuant to those sections shall 262
be taken by the sponsor of the school. 263
(25) Beginning in the 2006-2007 school year, the school 264
will open for operation not later than the thirtieth day of 265
September each school year, unless the mission of the school as 266
specified under division (A)(2) of this section is solely to 267
serve dropouts. In its initial year of operation, if the school 268
fails to open by the thirtieth day of September, or within one 269
year after the adoption of the contract pursuant to division (D) 270
of section 3314.02 of the Revised Code if the mission of the 271
school is solely to serve dropouts, the contract shall be void. 272
(26) Whether the school's governing authority is planning 273
to seek designation for the school as a STEM school equivalent 274
under section 3326.032 of the Revised Code; 275
(27) That the school's attendance and participation 276
policies will be available for public inspection; 277
(28) That the school's attendance and participation 278
records shall be made available to the department, auditor of 279
state, and school's sponsor to the extent permitted under and in 280

H. B. No. 431 Page 11
As Introduced
accordance with the "Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act 281
of 1974," 88 Stat. 571, 20 U.S.C. 1232g, as amended, and any 282
regulations promulgated under that act, and section 3319.321 of 283
the Revised Code; 284
(29) If a school operates using the blended learning 285
model, as defined in section 3301.079 of the Revised Code, all 286
of the following information: 287
(a) An indication of what blended learning model or models 288
will be used; 289
(b) A description of how student instructional needs will 290
be determined and documented; 291
(c) The method to be used for determining competency, 292
granting credit, and promoting students to a higher grade level; 293
(d) The school's attendance requirements, including how 294
the school will document participation in learning 295
opportunities; 296
(e) A statement describing how student progress will be 297
monitored; 298
(f) A statement describing how private student data will 299
be protected; 300
(g) A description of the professional development 301
activities that will be offered to teachers. 302
(30) A provision requiring that all moneys the school's 303
operator loans to the school, including facilities loans or cash 304
flow assistance, must be accounted for, documented, and bear 305
interest at a fair market rate; 306
(31) A provision requiring that, if the governing 307

H. B. No. 431 Page 12
As Introduced
authority contracts with an attorney, accountant, or entity 308
specializing in audits, the attorney, accountant, or entity 309
shall be independent from the operator with which the school has 310
contracted. 311
(32) A provision requiring the governing authority to 312
adopt an enrollment and attendance policy that requires a 313
student's parent to notify the community school in which the 314
student is enrolled when there is a change in the location of 315
the parent's or student's primary residence. 316
(33) A provision requiring the governing authority to 317
adopt a student residence and address verification policy for 318
students enrolling in or attending the school. 319
(B) The community school shall also submit to the sponsor 320
a comprehensive plan for the school. The plan shall specify the 321
following: 322
(1) The process by which the governing authority of the 323
school will be selected in the future; 324
(2) The management and administration of the school; 325
(3) If the community school is a currently existing public 326
school or educational service center building, alternative 327
arrangements for current public school students who choose not 328
to attend the converted school and for teachers who choose not 329
to teach in the school or building after conversion; 330
(4) The instructional program and educational philosophy 331
of the school; 332
(5) Internal financial controls. 333
When submitting the plan under this division, the school 334
shall also submit copies of all policies and procedures 335

H. B. No. 431 Page 13
As Introduced
regarding internal financial controls adopted by the governing 336
authority of the school. 337
(C) A contract entered into under section 3314.02 of the 338
Revised Code between a sponsor and the governing authority of a 339
community school may provide for the community school governing 340
authority to make payments to the sponsor, which is hereby 341
authorized to receive such payments as set forth in the contract 342
between the governing authority and the sponsor. The total 343
amount of such payments for monitoring, oversight, and technical 344
assistance of the school shall not exceed three per cent of the 345
total amount of payments for operating expenses that the school 346
receives from the state. 347
(D) The contract shall specify the duties of the sponsor 348
which shall be in accordance with the written agreement entered 349
into with the department under division (B) of section 3314.015 350
of the Revised Code and shall include the following: 351
(1) Monitor the community school's compliance with all 352
laws applicable to the school and with the terms of the 353
contract; 354
(2) Monitor and evaluate the academic and fiscal 355
performance and the organization and operation of the community 356
school on at least an annual basis; 357
(3) Provide technical assistance to the community school 358
in complying with laws applicable to the school and terms of the 359
contract; 360
(4) Take steps to intervene in the school's operation to 361
correct problems in the school's overall performance, declare 362
the school to be on probationary status pursuant to section 363
3314.073 of the Revised Code, suspend the operation of the 364

H. B. No. 431 Page 14
As Introduced
school pursuant to section 3314.072 of the Revised Code, or 365
terminate the contract of the school pursuant to section 3314.07 366
of the Revised Code as determined necessary by the sponsor; 367
(5) Have in place a plan of action to be undertaken in the 368
event the community school experiences financial difficulties or 369
closes prior to the end of a school year. 370
(E) Upon the expiration of a contract entered into under 371
this section, the sponsor of a community school may, with the 372
approval of the governing authority of the school, renew that 373
contract for a period of time determined by the sponsor, but not 374
ending earlier than the end of any school year, if the sponsor 375
finds that the school's compliance with applicable laws and 376
terms of the contract and the school's progress in meeting the 377
academic goals prescribed in the contract have been 378
satisfactory. Any contract that is renewed under this division 379
remains subject to the provisions of sections 3314.07, 3314.072, 380
and 3314.073 of the Revised Code. 381
(F) If a community school fails to open for operation 382
within one year after the contract entered into under this 383
section is adopted pursuant to division (D) of section 3314.02 384
of the Revised Code or permanently closes prior to the 385
expiration of the contract, the contract shall be void and the 386
school shall not enter into a contract with any other sponsor. A 387
school shall not be considered permanently closed because the 388
operations of the school have been suspended pursuant to section 389
3314.072 of the Revised Code. 390
Sec. 3326.11. Each science, technology, engineering, and 391
mathematics school established under this chapter and its 392
governing body shall comply with sections 9.90, 9.91, 109.65, 393
121.22, 149.43, 2151.357, 2151.421, 2313.19, 2921.42, 2921.43, 394

H. B. No. 431 Page 15
As Introduced
3301.0714, 3301.0715, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.14, 395
3313.15, 3313.16, 3313.18, 3313.201, 3313.26, 3313.472, 396
3313.473, 3313.474, 3313.48, 3313.481, 3313.482, 3313.50, 397
3313.539, 3313.5310, 3313.5318, 3313.5319, 3313.608, 3313.6012, 398
3313.6013, 3313.6014, 3313.6020, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 399
3313.6024, 3313.6026, 3313.6028, 3313.6029, 3313.61, 3313.611, 400
3313.614, 3313.615, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.643, 401
3313.648, 3313.6411, 3313.6413, 3313.66, 3313.661, 3313.662, 402
3313.666, 3313.667, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.67, 403
3313.671, 3313.672, 3313.673, 3313.675, 3313.69, 3313.71, 404
3313.716, 3313.717, 3313.718, 3313.719, 3313.7112, 3313.7117, 405
3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.80, 3313.801, 3313.814, 3313.816, 406
3313.817, 3313.818, 3313.819, 3313.86, 3313.89, 3313.96, 407
3319.073, 3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.0812, 3319.21, 3319.238, 408
3319.318, 3319.32, 3319.321, 3319.324, 3319.35, 3319.39, 409
3319.391, 3319.393, 3319.41, 3319.45, 3319.46, 3319.90, 410
3319.614, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3321.01, 3321.041, 411
3321.05, 3321.13, 3321.14, 3321.141, 3321.17, 3321.18, 3321.19, 412
3321.191, 3322.20, 3322.24, 3323.251, 3327.10, 4111.17, 4113.52, 413
5502.262, 5502.703, and 5705.391 and Chapters 102., 117., 1347., 414
2744., 3307., 3309., 3365., 3742., 4112., 4123., 4141., and 415
4167. of the Revised Code as if it were a school district. 416
Sec. 3328.24. A college-preparatory boarding school 417
established under this chapter and its board of trustees shall 418
comply with sections 102.02, 3301.0710, 3301.0711, 3301.0712, 419
3301.0714, 3301.0729, 3301.948, 3302.037, 3313.474, 3313.5318, 420
3313.5319, 3313.6013, 3313.6021, 3313.6023, 3313.6024, 421
3313.6026, 3313.6029, 3313.617, 3313.618, 3313.6114, 3313.6411, 422
3313.6413, 3313.668, 3313.669, 3313.6610, 3313.675, 3313.717, 423
3313.7112, 3313.7117, 3313.721, 3313.753, 3313.89, 3319.073, 424
3319.077, 3319.078, 3319.318, 3319.324, 3319.39, 3319.391, 425

H. B. No. 431 Page 16
As Introduced
3319.393, 3319.46, 3320.01, 3320.02, 3320.03, 3320.04, 3323.251, 426
and 5502.262, and Chapter 3365. of the Revised Code as if the 427
school were a school district and the school's board of trustees 428
were a district board of education. 429
Section 2. That existing sections 3314.03, 3326.11, and 430
3328.24 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 431
Section 3. All items in this act are hereby appropriated 432
as designated out of any moneys in the state treasury to the 433
credit of the designated fund. For all operating appropriations 434
made in this act, those in the first column are for fiscal year 435
2026 and those in the second column are for fiscal year 2027. 436
The operating appropriations made in this act are in addition to 437
any other operating appropriations made for these fiscal years. 438
Section 4. 439
440
1 2 3 4 5
A BOR DEPARTMENT OF HIGHER EDUCATION
B General Revenue Fund
C GRF 235430 Human Trafficking $5,000,000 $5,000,000
Screening
D TOTAL GRF General Revenue Fund $5,000,000 $5,000,000
E TOTAL ALL BUDGET FUND GROUPS $5,000,000 $5,000,000
HUMAN TRAFFICKING SCREENING 441
The foregoing appropriation item 235430, Human Trafficking 442
Screening, shall be allocated to the University of Toledo to 443

H. B. No. 431 Page 17
As Introduced
provide training at no cost to public schools on how to use its 444
FOCUS youth screening tool and to create and maintain an online 445
portal to track the results from public schools from using the 446
tool pursuant to section 3313.675 of the Revised Code. 447
Section 5. Within the limits set forth in this act, the 448
Director of Budget and Management shall establish accounts 449
indicating the source and amount of funds for each appropriation 450
made in this act, and shall determine the manner in which 451
appropriation accounts shall be maintained. Expenditures from 452
operating appropriations contained in this act shall be 453
accounted for as though made in, and are subject to all 454
applicable provisions of, the main operating appropriations act 455
of the 136th General Assembly. 456
Section 6. The General Assembly, applying the principle 457
stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that 458
amendments are to be harmonized if reasonably capable of 459
simultaneous operation, finds that the following sections, 460
presented in this act as composites of the sections as amended 461
by the acts indicated, are the resulting versions of the 462
sections in effect prior to the effective date of the sections 463
as presented in this act: 464
Section 3314.03 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 465
H.B. 214, H.B. 250, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 466
all of the 135th General Assembly. 467
Section 3326.11 of the Revised Code as amended by H.B. 8, 468
H.B. 47, H.B. 214, S.B. 104, S.B. 168, S.B. 208, and S.B. 234, 469
all of the 135th General Assembly. 470
Section 3328.24 of the Revised Code as amended by both 471
S.B. 208 and S.B. 234 of the 135th General Assembly. 472